Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2638
Grants; limitations.

The total amount of grants awarded under the Child Care Capacity Building and Workforce Act shall be subject to the appropriation of funds from the Child Care Capacity Building and Workforce Cash Fund.

Laws 2024, LB164, § 42.